Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 6

Loans

45-4-601. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Installment loan” means a loan repayable in installments, whether the payments are regular or irregular, whether the payments are in substantially equal amounts or otherwise, whether the payments are made on closed-end loans or open-end loans, and whether or not interest on the loan has been precomputed; and

“Loans” are transactions involving the transfer, or the crediting, by a lender to, or for the benefit of, a borrower or another, of any amount of money, with a promise of repayment.

Other terms used in this part, not defined in this part, have the same meanings given to them by the general statute pertaining to interest and other charges by lenders or creditors.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 17; Shan. Supp., § 2198a24; Code 1932, § 3851; Acts 1951, ch. 192, § 2; 1976, ch. 525, § 2; 1979, ch. 207, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1820.

45-4-602. Interest.

A credit union may lend to its members at a maximum effective rate of interest, which shall not be in excess of the greater of:

The applicable formula rate; or

The rate of interest permitted to be charged by credit unions chartered by the federal government.

For installment loans, the maximum effective rate of interest shall:

Be determined in accordance with the actuarial method;

Be calculated, in the case of a precomputed loan, on the assumption that all scheduled payments will be made as contracted; and

Not be affected by the prepayment of the loan, in whole or in part.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 17; Shan. Supp., § 2198a24; Code 1932, § 3851; Acts 1951, ch. 192, § 2; 1976, ch. 525, § 2; 1979, ch. 207, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1820; Acts 1986, ch. 558, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Usury, § 14.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

45-4-603. Loan charges.

In addition to the charging and collecting of interest as provided in §45-4-602, a credit union shall be entitled to charge and collect from its members loan charges that are fair and reasonable compensation for some expense incurred or to be suffered by the credit union, or some service rendered or to be rendered, in connection with a particular loan; and in any event, the loan or contract shall not include, except as part of interest, charges for costs indirectly related to that loan or contract, including, but not limited to, overhead of the credit union, loan losses, and charges for services performed by officers or employees of the credit union unless the services are rendered directly for the inspection of collateral, the servicing of the loan after it is made, or the collection thereof.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 17; Shan. Supp., § 2198a24; Code 1932, § 3851; Acts 1951, ch. 192, § 2; 1976, ch. 525, § 2; 1979, ch. 207, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1820.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Usury, § 14.

45-4-604. Priority of loans.

The funds of credit unions shall be used first for loans to members.

Funds of credit unions not required for loans to members may be invested as otherwise provided by law.

If available funds do not permit all loans to be made that have been approved by the credit committee or loan officer, preference shall be given to the smaller loans that have been approved.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 17; Shan. Supp., § 2198a24; Code 1932, § 3851; Acts 1951, ch. 192, § 2; 1976, ch. 525, § 2; 1979, ch. 207, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1820.

Cross-References. Investment in obligations of federal housing administration, Federal National Mortgage Association and veterans' administration, §35-3-120.

Law Reviews.

Creditors' Rights and Security Transactions — 1962 Tennessee Survey (Forrest W. Lacey), 16 Vand. L. Rev. 706.

45-4-605. Conditions of lending.

A credit union may loan to its members, as provided, for the purposes and upon the security that the bylaws may provide and the credit committee shall approve.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 19; Shan. Supp., § 2198a26; Code 1932, § 3853; Acts 1937, ch. 264, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3853; Acts 1963, ch. 30, § 5; 1970, ch. 409, § 3; 1975, ch. 225, § 1; 1978, ch. 552, § 4; 1979, ch. 86, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1821.

45-4-606. Agricultural loans.

A member who needs funds with which to purchase necessary supplies for growing crops may receive a loan in fixed monthly installments instead of one (1) sum.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 19; Shan. Supp., § 2198a26; Code 1932, § 3853; Acts 1937, ch. 264, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3853; Acts 1963, ch. 30, § 5; 1970, ch. 409, § 3; 1975, ch. 225, § 1; 1978, ch. 552, § 4; 1979, ch. 86, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1821.

45-4-607. Repayment on any business day.

A borrower may repay the whole or any part of the loan on any day on which the office of the corporation is open for the transaction of business.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 19; Shan. Supp., § 2198a26; Code 1932, § 3853; Acts 1937, ch. 264, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3853; Acts 1963, ch. 30, § 5; 1970, ch. 409, § 3; 1975, ch. 225, § 1; 1978, ch. 552, § 4; 1979, ch. 86, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1821.

45-4-608. Loans to directors and committee members.

Subject to the limitations on loans contained in §45-4-203 and as specified in written loan policies established by the board of directors, a director or member of the credit or supervisory committee shall be allowed to borrow from the corporation.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 19; Shan. Supp., § 2198a26; Code 1932, § 3853; Acts 1937, ch. 264, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3853; Acts 1963, ch. 30, § 5; 1970, ch. 409, § 3; 1975, ch. 225, § 1; 1978, ch. 552, § 4; 1979, ch. 86, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1821; Acts 1982, ch. 722, § 4.

45-4-609. Lien on stock and dividends for debts — Cancellation and liquidation upon withdrawal.

A credit union shall have a lien on the shares of any member and on the dividends payable thereon for and to the extent of any loan made to the member and of any dues and fines payable by the member.

A credit union may, upon the resignation or expulsion of a member, cancel the shares of the member and apply the withdrawal value of the shares toward the liquidation of the member's indebtedness.

Acts 1923, ch. 68, § 15; Shan. Supp., § 2198a22; Code 1932, § 3849; C. Supp. 1950, § 3849; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 45-1822.

45-4-610. State chartered credit unions — Power to make loans — Interest rate.

Subject to the limitations on maximum effective rates of interest and service charges contained in §§45-4-601 —45-4-604, a credit union chartered by the state of Tennessee has the power to make loans upon the same terms and conditions as permitted credit unions chartered by the federal government.

Acts 1976, ch. 278, § 1; 1979, ch. 207, § 2; T.C.A., § 45-1849.